en: Beer-based alcoholic beverages
de: Bierbasierte alkoholische Getränke
es: Bebidas alcohólicas a base de cerveza
fr: Boissons alcoolisées à base de bière
hr: Alkoholna pića na bazi piva
hu: Söralapú alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche a base di birra
nl: Bier gebaseerde alcoholische dranken
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas à base de cerveja
ru: Алкогольные напитки на основе пива

en: Shandy, Beer with lemonade
cy: Siandi
de: Biermischgetränk, Biermixgetränk
eo: Limonadbiero
es: Refajo
fi: Shandy
fr: Panaché, Limonade et bière, Bières à la limonade
he: שנדי
hr: pivo s okusom
hy: Շենդի
it: Birra al limone, Panaché
ja: シャンディ・ガフ
mk: Радлер
nl: Shandy
pl: Shandy, Piwo z lemoniadą
pt: Panaché
sv: Shandy

en: Shandy with less than 1° of alcohol
de: Shandy mit weniger als 1° Alkohol
es: Shandy con menos de 1° de alcohol
fr: Panaché à moins de 1° d'alcool
hr: Shandy s manje od 1° alkohola
it: Shandy con meno di 1° di alcol
nl: Shandy met minder dan 1° alcohol
pt: Shandy com menos de 1° de álcool

en: Rum-based alcoholic beverages
de: Rum-basierte alkoholische Getränke
es: Bebidas alcohólicas a base de ron
fr: Boissons alcoolisées à base de Rhum
hr: Alkoholna pića na bazi ruma
hu: Rumalapú alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche a base di rum
nl: Rum-gebaseerde alcoholische dranken
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas à base de rum

en: Vodka-based alcoholic beverages
es: Bebidas alcohólicas a base de vodka
fr: Boissons alcoolisées à base de vodka
hr: Alkoholna pića na bazi votke
hu: Vodkaalapú alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche a base di vodka
nl: Vodka-gebaseerde alcoholische dranken
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas à base de vodka
ro: Băuturi alcoolice pe bază de vodcă

en: Wine-based alcoholic beverages
de: Weinbasierte alkoholische Getränke
es: Bebidas alcohólicas a base de vino
fr: Boissons alcoolisées à base de vin
hr: Alkoholna pića na bazi vina
hu: Boralapú alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche a base di vino
nl: Wijngebaseerde alcoholische dranken
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas à base de vinho
ro: Băuturi alcoolice pe bază de vin
sv: Vinbaserade alkoholhaltiga drycker

en: Sangria
xx: Sangria
es: Sangría

en: Mulled wines, Mulled wine, Mulled red wines
an: poncho
ar: نبيذ ساخن
be: глінтвейн
ca: vi calent
cs: svařené víno
cv: глинтвейн
cy: gwin brwd
da: gløgg
de: Glühwein
eo: spicvino
es: vino caliente
et: hõõgvein
eu: Ardo bero
fa: شراب معطر
fi: hehkuviini
fr: vin chaud
ga: scailtín fíona
he: יין מתובל
hr: kuhano vino
hu: Forralt bor, Forraltbor
hy: գլինտվեյն
id: Glühwein
it: vin brulé
ja: グリューワイン
jv: Ciu rempah
ka: გლინტვეინი
kk: глинтвейн
ko: 글뤼바인
li: Glühwein
lv: karstvīns
mk: варено вино
nl: warme wijn
no: Caud vin
pl: grzane wino
pt: vinho quente
ro: vin fiert
ru: глинтвейн
sk: varené víno
sl: kuhano vino
sr: кувано вино
th: ไวน์ร้อน
tr: sıcak şarap
uk: глінтвейн
vi: vang nóng
zh: 香料酒

en: Pastis
xx: Pastis
fr: Pastis
nl: Pastis, Anijsdranken

en: Absinthe
de: Absinth
es: Absenta
fr: Absinthe
hu: Abszint
it: Assenzio
nl: Absint
pl: Absynt
pt: Absinto
zh: 苦艾酒

en: Rice wines
ca: Vi d'arròs
cs: Rýžové víno
cy: Gwin reis
da: Risvine
de: Reiswein
eo: Rizalkoholaĵoj
es: Vinos de arroz, Vino de arroz
eu: Arroz ardo
fa: شراب برنج
fi: Riisiviini
fr: Alcools de riz, Alcool de riz
gl: Viño de arroz
hu: Rizsbor
hy: Բրնձի գինի
id: Arak beras
it: Vino di riso
ja: ライスワイン
ko: 미주
la: Vinum ex oryza
ms: Arak beras
nb: Risviner
nl: Rijstwijn
nn: Risvinar
pl: Wino ryżowe, Wina ryżowe
pt: Vinhos de arroz, Vinho de arroz
ru: Рисовое вино
sl: Riževo vino
sv: Risviner
tr: Pirinç şarabı
uk: Рисове вино
zh: 米酒

xx: Sake
en: Sake
bg: Саке
fr: Saké
hu: Szaké
it: Sake, Sakè
ja: 日本酒, にほんしゅ
nl: Saké
pt: Saquê

en: Shoshu
ja: 焼酎
pt: Shochu

en: Awamori
xx: Awamori

en: Kome-shochu
xx: Kome-shochu

en: Kasutori-shochu, sake kasu
xx: Kasutori-shochu, sake kasu
pt: Kasutori-shochu, saquê kasu

en: Imo-Shoshu
xx: Imo-Shoshu

en: Mugi-Shoshu
xx: Mugi-Shoshu

en: Soba-Shoshu
xx: Soba-Shoshu

en: Kokuto-Shoshu, Kokutojochu
xx: Kokuto-Shoshu, Kokutojochu